Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB939.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 120250SB0939PN1424 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence and Data Center Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliated group." One or more chains of corporations, limited liability entities or partnerships, or any combination thereof, connected through the ownership of stock or ownership interests with a common parent that is a corporation, limited liability entity or partnership, but only if the common parent owns directly, or indirectly, a controlling interest in each of the members of the group."Artificial intelligence." Technology or tools that use predictive algorithms to create new content, including audio, code, images, text simulations or videos."Critical IT load." That portion of electric power capacity, expressed in terms of megawatts, that is reserved solely for owners or tenants of a data center to operate their computer server equipment. The term does not include an ancillary load for common areas."AFFILIATED GROUP." A PERSON THAT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THROUGH ONE OR MORE INTERMEDIARIES, CONTROLS OR IS CONTROLLED BY, OR IS UNDER COMMON CONTROL WITH THE PERSON SPECIFIED."APPLICABLE AGENCY." ANY DEPARTMENT, BOARD OR COMMISSION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."APPLICANT." AN INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY THAT APPLIES TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.20250SB0939PN1424 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE." THE FOLLOWING:(1) A MACHINE-BASED SYSTEM THAT CAN, FOR A GIVEN SET OF HUMAN-DEFINED OBJECTIVES, MAKE PREDICTIONS, RECOMMENDATIONS OR DECISIONS INFLUENCING REAL OR VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS, INCLUDING THE ABILITY TO:(I) PERCEIVE REAL AND VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS;(II) ABSTRACT PERCEPTIONS MADE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH INTO MODELS THROUGH ANALYSIS IN AN AUTOMATED MANNER; AND(III) USE MODEL INFERENCE TO FORMULATE OPTIONS FOR INFORMATION OR ACTION BASED ON OUTCOMES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPHS (I) AND (II).(2) THE TERM INCLUDES GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE."ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY PRODUCT OR SERVICE." A PRODUCT OR SERVICE INVOLVING ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY THAT REQUIRES COMMONWEALTH LICENSURE, REGISTRATION OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION."CONSUMER." A PERSON THAT PURCHASES OR OTHERWISE ENTERS INTO A TRANSACTION AGREEMENT TO RECEIVE AN INNOVATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY PRODUCT OR SERVICE THAT IS BEING TESTED BY A PARTICIPANT."Data center." A facility or group of facilities that is used to house and operate equipment that:(1) receives, stores, aggregates, manages, processes, transforms, retrieves, researches or transmits data; or(2) is necessary for the proper operation of equipment that receives, stores, aggregates, manages, processes, transforms, retrieves, researches or transmits data."Emerging technology." Technologies still in development and deemed by the office to have a significant impact on society in 20250SB0939PN1424 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the next decade, including, but not limited to, artificial intelligence, robotics and blockchain technology."High impact data center." A facility or group of facilities that satisfies all of the following:(1) Is a data center.(2) Consists of one or more parcels in this Commonwealth, along with the buildings, substations and other infrastructure, fixtures and personal property located on the parcels.(3) Is owned, operated or leased by an entity or affiliated group of entities.(4) Has a critical IT load of 50 megawatts or higher."GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE." THE CLASS OF MODELS THAT EMULATE THE STRUCTURE AND CHARACTERISTICS OF INPUT DATA IN ORDER TO GENERATE DERIVED SYNTHETIC CONTENT, INCLUDING INFORMATION SUCH AS IMAGES, VIDEOS, AUDIO CLIPS OR TEXT, THAT HAS BEEN SIGNIFICANTLY MODIFIED OR GENERATED BY ALGORITHMS, INCLUDING BY ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE."Information technology" or "IT." The study, use and application of computer, telecommunication and other technological systems for the purposes of storing, retrieving and sending information."Normal data processing activity." Activity conducted by a data center that is part of regular daily operations."INNOVATION." THE USE OR INCORPORATION OF A NEW OR EMERGING TECHNOLOGY, OR A NEW USE OF EXISTING TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING BLOCKCHAIN TECHNOLOGY, TO ADDRESS A PROBLEM, PROVIDE A BENEFIT OR OTHERWISE OFFER A PRODUCT, SERVICE, BUSINESS MODEL OR DELIVERY MECHANISM KNOWN BY THE OFFICE TO HAVE A COMPARABLE WIDESPREAD OFFERING IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.20250SB0939PN1424 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "INNOVATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY PRODUCT OR SERVICE." AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY PRODUCT OR SERVICE THAT INCLUDES AN INNOVATION."Office." The Office of Transformation and Opportunity established by this act."PARTICIPANT." A PERSON WHO HAS APPLIED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM AND HAS BEEN ACCEPTED BY THE OFFICE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM."PROGRAM." THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY REGULATORY SANDBOX PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS ACT."TEST." THE PROVISION OF AN INNOVATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTER AND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY PRODUCT OR SERVICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS CHAPTER.Section 103. Establishment of office.The Office of Transformation and Opportunity is established within the Governor's Office and shall have the powers and exercise the duties specified in this act.CHAPTER 3HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTERSSection 301. High impact data center.(a) Notification to office.--(1) The owner of a data center operating in this Commonwealth shall notify the office if the data center becomes a high impact data center. The notification must be sent to the office:(i) not later than 30 days after the data center becomes a high impact data center; or(ii) if the owner reasonably anticipates that the 20250SB0939PN1424 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 data center will, at some future date, become a high impact data center, prior to the future date.(2) The notification shall include known or expected power consumption of the data center and other information as required by the office. If the notification is sent under paragraph (1)(ii), the notification shall include the future date.(b) Confirmation by office.--(1) The office shall identify and designate high impact data centers in this Commonwealth.(2) The office shall review a notification submitted by an owner under subsection (a). If the office determines that the data center is or will become a high impact data center, the office shall issue confirmation to the owner not later than 14 days after receipt of the notification.(c) Recordkeeping.--Any information provided under this section by an owner that the owner identifies as confidential business information shall be exempt from inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 302. Uniformity of local ordinances.(a) Requirements.--A local ordinance regulating high impact data centers shall allow for the reasonable development of high impact data centers.(b) Reasonable development.--In order to allow for the reasonable development of high impact data centers, a local ordinance:(1) May not impose conditions, requirements or limitations on the construction of high impact data centers that are more stringent than conditions, requirements or 20250SB0939PN1424 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limitations imposed on construction activities for other industrial uses within the geographic boundaries of the local government.(2) May not impose conditions, requirements or limitations on the heights of structures, screening and fencing, lighting or noise relating to permanent high impact data centers that are more stringent than the conditions, requirements or limitations imposed on other industrial uses or other land development within the particular zoning district where the high impact data centers are situated within the local government.(3) Shall include a review period for permitted uses that does not exceed 30 days for complete submissions or 120 days for conditional uses.(4) May impose restrictions on vehicular access routes for overweight vehicles only as authorized under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles) or the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code.(5) May not impose limits or conditions on operations or hours of operation of the high impact data center as it relates to normal data processing activity.CHAPTER 3(RESERVED)CHAPTER 5ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE, DATA CENTERAND EMERGING TECHNOLOGY REGULATORY SANDBOX PROGRAMSection 501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 20250SB0939PN1424 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicable agency." The Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of Labor and Industry and the Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth and any department, board or commission of the Commonwealth."Applicant." An individual or entity that applies to participate in the program."Artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service." A product or service involving artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology that requires Commonwealth licensure, registration or other authorization."Consumer." A person that purchases or otherwise enters into a transaction agreement to receive an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service that is being tested by a participant."Innovation." The use or incorporation of a new or emerging technology, or a new use of existing technology, including blockchain technology, to address a problem, provide a benefit or otherwise offer a product, service, business model or delivery mechanism known by the department to have a comparable widespread offering in this Commonwealth."Innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service." An artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service that includes an innovation."Participant." A person who has applied to participate in the program and has been accepted by the office to participate in the program."Program." The Artificial Intelligence, Data Center and Emerging Technology Regulatory Sandbox Program established by 20250SB0939PN1424 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this act."Test." The provision of an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service in accordance with this chapter.SECTION 501. (RESERVED).Section 502. Artificial Intelligence, Data Center and Emerging Technology Regulatory Sandbox Program.(a) Establishment.--The Artificial Intelligence, Data Center and Emerging Technology Regulatory Sandbox Program is established in the office. The office shall consult with each applicable agency to implement the program. The program shall enable a person PARTICIPANT to obtain limited access to the market in this Commonwealth to test an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service without obtaining a license or other authorization that might otherwise be required.(b) Powers and duties of office.--The office:(1) May enter into agreements with or follow ADOPT the best practices of the Bureau of Consumer Protection CORRESPONDING FEDERAL REGULATORY AGENCIES or other states that are administering programs similar to the program. AGREEMENTS UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT IMPOSE ADDITIONAL LIMITATIONS ON THE PROGRAM.(2) Shall review applications submitted for participation in the program.(3) May not approve participation in the program by an applicant or any other participant that has been convicted, entered a plea of nolo contendere or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere held in abeyance, for a serious crime:(i) involving theft, fraud or dishonesty; or20250SB0939PN1424 - 10 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) that bears a substantial relationship to the applicant's or participant's ability to safely or competently participate in the program.(c) Application.--A person PARTICIPANT must submit an application to the office in order to be approved for participation in the program. The application must be in a form prescribed by the office that:(1) Demonstrates the applicant is subject to the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth.(2) Demonstrates the applicant has established a physical or virtual location that is adequately accessible to the office from which testing will be developed and performed and where all required records, documents and data will be maintained.(3) Contains relevant personal and contact information for the applicant, including legal names, addresses, telephone numbers, email addresses, website addresses and other information required by the office.(4) Discloses any criminal conviction of the applicant or other participating personnel.(5) Demonstrates that the applicant has the necessary personnel, financial and technical expertise, access to capital and developed plan to test, monitor and assess an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service.(6) Contains a description of the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service to be tested, including statements regarding the following:(i) How the innovative artificial intelligence, data 20250SB0939PN1424 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 center and emerging technology product or service is subject to licensing or other authorization requirements outside of the program, including a specific list of all State laws, regulations and licensing or other requirements that the applicant seeks to have waived during the testing period.(ii) How the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service would benefit consumers OR THE COMMONWEALTH.(iii) How the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service is different from other artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology products or services available in this Commonwealth.(iv) What risks may confront THIS COMMONWEALTH OR consumers that use or purchase the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service.(v) How participating in the program would enable a successful test of the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service.(vi) A description of how the applicant will perform ongoing duties after the test.(vii) How the applicant will end the test and protect consumers if the test fails, including providing evidence of sufficient liability coverage and financial reserves to protect consumers OR THE COMMONWEALTH and to protect against insolvency by the applicant.(d) Separate applications required.--An applicant must file 20250SB0939PN1424 - 12 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a separate application for each innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service the applicant intends to test.(e) Additional information.--After an application is filed and before approving the application, the office may seek such additional information from the applicant as the office determines is necessary.(f) Time period for review of application.--Not later than 90 days after the date on which a complete application is received by the office, the office shall inform the applicant as to whether the application is approved for participation in the program.(g) Extensions.--The office and an applicant may mutually agree to extend the period specified in subsection (f).(H) CONFIDENTIALITY.--INFORMATION SUBMITTED FOR THE PURPOSES OF AN APPLICATION TO THE OFFICE SHALL BE DEEMED CONFIDENTIAL AND NOT SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW.Section 503. Review of application.(a) Consultation required.--(1) In reviewing an application under this section, the office shall MAY consult with, and get approval from, each applicable agency before approving an application for participation in the program.(2) The consultation under paragraph (1) may include seeking information about whether:(i) The applicable agency has previously issued a license or other authorization to the applicant.(ii) The applicable agency has previously investigated, sanctioned or pursued legal action against 20250SB0939PN1424 - 13 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the applicant.(iii) Whether the applicant could obtain a license or other authorization from the applicable agency after exiting the program.(iv) Whether certain licensure or other regulations should not be waived even if the applicant is accepted for participation in the program.(b) Consideration of competition.--In reviewing an application under this section, the office shall consider whether a competitor of the applicant is or has been a participant and weigh that participation as a factor in approving the applicant as a participant.(c) Approval.--If the office and each applicable agency approve the application, the applicant shall become a participant.(d) Denial notice.--If the office denies an application submitted under this section, the office shall provide to the applicant a written description of the reasons for the denial.(D) CURING PERIOD.--IF THE OFFICE DENIES AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SECTION, AFTER RECEIVING A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF THE REASONS FOR THE DENIAL, AN APPLICANT SHALL HAVE 60 DAYS TO CORRECT AND RESUBMIT THE APPLICATION.(E) DENIAL NOTICE.--IF THE OFFICE DENIES A SUBSEQUENT CURING ATTEMPT UNDER SUBSECTION (D), THE OFFICE SHALL PROVIDE TO THE APPLICANT A WRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF THE REASONS FOR THE DENIAL. THE APPLICANT MAY THEN REAPPLY FOR APPROVAL FOLLOWING NOTICE.Section 504. Test period.(a) Duration of test period.--A participant has 12 months after the date on which the application was approved to test the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging 20250SB0939PN1424 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 technology product or service described in the application.(b) Requirements.--A participant testing an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service within the program is subject to the following:(1) The office may, if applicable on a case-by-case basis, specify the maximum number of items for each item that may be offered by the participant during the test of the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service.(2) The office shall notify other businesses in the industry that a waiver was granted to afford other companies the opportunity to apply for the same waiver. PUBLISH ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AN EASILY ACCESSIBLE LIST OF GRANTED WAIVERS.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict a participant that holds a license or other authorization in another jurisdiction from acting in accordance with that license or other authorization.(d) Licensing requirements under other law.--(1) A participant is deemed to possess an appropriate license under the laws of this Commonwealth for the purposes of any provision of Federal law requiring State licensure or authorization.(2) A participant that is testing an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service is not subject to the requirements of State law, regulations, licensing requirements or authorizations that were identified by the participant's application and have been waived in writing by the office.20250SB0939PN1424 - 15 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 505. Liability.A participant does not have immunity related to any CIVIL OR criminal offense committed during participation in the program.Section 506. Termination of participation in program.By written notice, the office may terminate a participant's participation in the program at any time and for any reason, including if the applicable department determines the participant is not operating in good faith to bring an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service to market.Section 507. Business losses and expenses.(a) Office.--The office and the office's employees shall not be liable for any business loss or the recoupment of application expenses related to the program, including expenses relating to:(1) Denying an application for participation in the program for any reason.(2) Terminating a participant's participation in the program at any time and for any reason.(b) Guaranty associations.--A guaranty association in this Commonwealth may not be held liable for any business loss or expense incurred as a result of activities undertaken by a participant in the program.Section 508. Consumer protection.(a) Disclosure required.--Before providing an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service to a consumer, a participant shall disclose the following to the consumer:(1) The name and contact information of the participant.(2) A statement that the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or 20250SB0939PN1424 - 16 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 service is authorized under the program and, if applicable, that the participant does not have a license or other authorization to provide an artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service under State law that regulates artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology products outside the program.(3) A statement that the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service is undergoing testing and may not function as intended and may expose the customer to financial risk.(4) A statement that the provider of the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service is not immune from civil liability for any losses or damages caused by the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service.(5) A statement that the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service is a temporary test that may be discontinued at the end of the testing period.(6) The expected end date of the testing period.(7) A statement that a consumer may contact the office to file a complaint regarding the innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service being tested and provide the office's telephone number and publicly accessible Internet website where a complaint may be filed.(b) Form of disclosure.--The disclosure required by subsection (a) shall be provided to a consumer, in a clear and conspicuous form and, for an Internet or application-based 20250SB0939PN1424 - 17 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service, the consumer must acknowledge receipt of the disclosure before a transaction may be completed.Section 509. Exiting the program.(a) Duties of participant.--At least 30 days before the end of the testing period, a participant must:(1) notify the office that the participant will exit the program, discontinue the participant's test and stop offering any innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service in the program not later than 60 days after the date on which the 12-month testing period ends; or(2) seek an extension in accordance with section 510.(b) Effect of noncompliance.--Subject to subsection (c), if the office does not receive notification as required by subsection (a), the testing period ends at the end of the 12-month testing period and the participant shall immediately stop offering each innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service being tested.(c) Exception.--If a test includes offering an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service that requires ongoing duties, the participant shall continue to fulfill the duties of the program or, if the participant exits the program, arrange for another person to fulfill those duties after the date on which the artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service testing ends.Section 510. Extension.(a) Time period to request extension.--Not later than 30 days before the end of the 12-month testing period, a 20250SB0939PN1424 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participant may request an extension of the testing period for the purpose of obtaining a license or other authorization.(b) Duty of office.--(1) The office shall grant or deny a request for an extension in accordance with subsection (a) by the end of the 12-month testing period.(2) The office may grant an extension in accordance with this section for not more than 12 months after the end of the testing period.(c) Quarterly reports.--A participant that obtains an extension in accordance with this section shall provide the office with a written report every three months that provides an update on efforts to obtain a license or other authorization required by law, including any submitted for licensure or other authorization, rejected applications or issued licenses or other authorizations.Section 511. Recordkeeping.(a) Duty of participant.--A participant shall retain records, documents and data produced in the ordinary course of business regarding an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service tested in the program.(b) Failure report.--If an innovative artificial intelligence, data center and emerging technology product or service of a participant fails before the end of a testing period, the participant shall notify the office and report on actions taken by the participant to ensure that consumers have not been harmed as a result of the failure.(c) Office to establish reporting requirements.--(1) The office shall establish quarterly reporting 20250SB0939PN1424 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements for a participant, including information about any customer complaints.(2) The office may request records, documents and data from a participant and, upon the department's OFFICE'S request, a participant shall make the records, documents and data available for inspection by the office.(3) If the office determines that a participant has engaged in, is engaging in or is about to engage in any practice or transaction that is in violation of this chapter or that constitutes a violation of Federal or State criminal law, the office may remove the participant from the program.Section 512. Report to General Assembly.By October 1, the office shall provide an annual written report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives that provides information regarding each participant and provides recommendations regarding the effectiveness of the program.CHAPTER 7FAST TRACKSection 701. High Impact Data Center Permit Program.The office shall establish the High Impact Data Center Permit Program. The program shall:(1) Provide project coordination services to all high impact data centers. Projected coordination services include developing coordinated timelines for permitting and approvals across relevant agencies, liaising with project sponsors and updating the dashboard specified in paragraph (2).(2) Assist in the operation and maintenance of a public-20250SB0939PN1424 - 20 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facing dashboard to display progress against established permitting timelines associated with all high impact data center development projects.(3) Design and implement a process to facilitate coordination among permitting agencies and to improve the timeliness, predictability and transparency of an applicable agency's review and authorization processes for designated critical infrastructure and economic development projects.(4) Provide technical assistance to implement the High Impact Data Center Permit Program.Section 702. Relationship with other agencies.All Commonwealth departments, boards, offices, commissions and other agencies under the Governor's jurisdiction shall cooperate with and provide assistance to the office as needed with respect to the purpose and responsibilities specified in this act.Section 703. Permit approval.CHAPTER 7BRING YOUR OWN GENERATIONSECTION 701. PERMIT APPROVAL.The office DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION shall establish approval timelines not to exceed 120 days for the following permits requested by any A high impact data center THAT MEETS THE CRITERIA UNDER SECTION 703, barring deficiencies:(1) 25 Pa. Code Ch. 102 (relating to erosion and sediment control).(2) 25 Pa. Code Ch. 105 (relating to dam safety and waterway management).(3) 25 Pa. Code Ch. 106 (relating to floodplain management).20250SB0939PN1424 - 21 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 704 702. Deemed approval of permit.If an applicable agency receives a completed application from a high impact data center and a permit decision delay occurs, the application shall be deemed approved and the applicable agency shall issue the permit.SECTION 703. CRITERIA.THIS CHAPTER SHALL ONLY APPLY TO HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTERS THAT:(1) GENERATE ENERGY AT A RATE AT OR ABOVE WHAT IS REQUIRED FOR 50 MEGAWATT CAPACITY FOR OPERATIONS THROUGH:(I) A NEW GENERATING RESOURCE;(II) UPRATE OR EXPANDED SERVICES AT AN EXISTING GENERATING RESOURCE; OR(III) A RESOURCE THAT WOULD OTHERWISE RETIRE EARLY OR DECOMMISSION DUE TO FINANCIAL CONSTRAINTS.(2) GENERATE ENERGY NOT TO BE SOLD FOR PUBLIC CONSUMPTION. ENERGY GENERATED IN EXCESS OF THAT NEEDED FOR THE HIGH IMPACT DATA CENTER OPERATION MAY BE DONATED FOR PUBLIC CONSUMPTION.CHAPTER 9DUTIES OF OFFICESection 901. Enumeration of duties.The office shall:(1) Facilitate the implementation of transformational economic development projects, which will result in substantial quality job opportunities and capital investment in this Commonwealth by:(i) coordinating and expediting interagency cooperation;(ii) marshaling Federal and State resources to 20250SB0939PN1424 - 22 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maximize economic development opportunities for this Commonwealth to compete, grow and thrive in a global economy; and(iii) leveraging the role of the Governor to engage the global business community on behalf of the Commonwealth.(2) Create a systematic process for managing economic development projects involving the resources of multiple State agencies to facilitate project management.(3) Establish and monitor the progress of additional areas of economic development project support, including serving as a one-stop shop for coordination of State agencies, expediting State agency permit and license reviews and ensuring speed of business review and approval of Commonwealth economic incentive programs.(4) Work in partnership with the Department of Community and Economic Development and all relevant State agencies in reviewing Federal and State funding applications to ensure that they maximize the opportunity to attract transformational economic development projects.(5) Establish objectives and targets for the implementation of transformative economic development projects prioritized by the Governor for this Commonwealth.(6) Establish and monitor time-based standards for completion of each phase of a transformative economic development project.(7) Work in partnership with the Department of Community and Economic Development and all relevant State agencies and coordinate with the Governor's Action Team Office to ensure that thorough due diligence is performed for prioritized 20250SB0939PN1424 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 projects, which shall include:(i) Overall economic impact of the project.(ii) The validity of its business model and likelihood of positive impact on an identified priority industry or sector.(iii) The impact on communities that have been disadvantaged and underserved.(iv) The strength of commitments for private financing of the project.(8) Work in partnership with the Department of Community and Economic Development, all relevant State agencies and the Governor to develop an overall economic development blueprint and strategy for this Commonwealth in identifying key industry and sectors where this Commonwealth has competitive advantages.Section 902. Staffing and administration.(a) Chief Transformation and Opportunity Officer.--(1) The Governor shall appoint a Chief Transformation and Opportunity Officer of the office who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and coordinate the implementation and development of the duties specified in this act.(2) The Chief Transformation and Opportunity Officer may hire staff, including economic development specialists, to perform the duties specified in this act.(3) The Chief Transformation and Opportunity Officer shall report directly to the Governor and the office shall operate from the Governor's Office.(b) (Reserved).Section 903. Reports.The office shall prepare and issue an annual report to the 20250SB0939PN1424 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Governor, THE PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES with the first annual report due December 31, 2025, AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION and subsequent reports due December 31 of each succeeding year. The annual report shall include an analysis and examination of significant economic development opportunities gained and lost by this Commonwealth within an identified time period and recommendations for improvement. The report shall be delivered to the Governor or the Governor's designee.CHAPTER 11MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 1101. (Reserved).Section 1102. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 90 days.20250SB0939PN1424 - 25 - <--<--<--<--1234567891011121314